District of Columbia statutes.
7-2081.01

Definitions.

For the purpose of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Antimicrobial drug” means a drug identified in the most current guidelines for the treatment of sexually transmitted infections recognized by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.

(2)

“DOH” means the Department of Health.

(3)

“Expedited partner therapy” or “EPT” means when a health care practitioner who has diagnosed a sexually transmitted infection in a patient, prescribes and dispenses antimicrobial drugs to the patient’s sexual partner for treatment of that sexually transmitted infection without an examination of the sexual partner.

(4)

“Health care practitioner” means a physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or physician’s assistant authorized to diagnose and prescribe drugs for sexually transmitted infections.

(5)

“STI” means a sexually transmitted infection.

History

Apr. 30, 2014, D.C. Law 20-97, § 2, 61 DCR 1589